






















 
 
 
 

 

 
The personal data chain. 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Whitepaper v2.0 Feb 2018  

1 



 

 
 

 
 
 
 

Vision 
 
Personal data is a very valuable asset that also         
represents an increasing risk. ​Centralized storage      
means that valuable personal data is always       
vulnerable. New legislation protects individuals and      
creates technical challenges for businesses.     
PikcioChain is a decentralized, secure, transparent      
and legally compliant means of exchanging personal       
data between individuals and businesses. PikcioChain      
empowers the individual. We validate, secure, store       
and allow the safe monetization of your personal        
information. PikcioChain puts the power over your       
data back into your hands. Together we are        
PikcioChain. 

 
 
 

  

2 



 

Table of Contents 
 
Abstract 4 

Securing personal data 6 
The Problem 6 
The Solution 8 
Use Cases 10 

Financial Services 10 
Medical Services 11 
P2Link - Validating medical data 11 
KYC - Know Your Customer 11 
Token Sales 12 

PikcioChain Products 12 
PikcioMe 12 
PikcioPro 13 
PikcioLab 13 
PikcioTokenSaleWallet (TSW) 13 

Competitor Comparison 16 

PikcioChain Distributed Ledger 17 
Proof of Usage (PoU) Consensus Algorithm 17 
The PKC token 21 

Go To Market Strategy 22 

Strategic Blockchain Partners 2​2 
NEO 2​2 
Building key partnerships: Onchain & Ontology 2​3 

Strategic Business Partners 2​4 
E&Y​, ​PricewaterhouseCoopers​, ​Capgemini 2​4 

Clients 2​5 
BNP Paribas - Cetelem​, ​BNP Paribas - Cardiff​, ​P2link 2​5 

Awards 2​6 

Accelerators 2​6 

Use of Proceeds 2​7 

Roadmap 2​8 

PikcioChain Team 29 
Leadership Team 29 
Advisors 3​0 

Token Sale 3​2 
 

3 



 

Abstract 
 
Governments all over the world have recently been introducing, or proposing, legislation in regards to               
data privacy and storage. In recent years, legislation has been moving clearly in the direction of giving                 
data ownership back to people. That is especially visible in Europe, where with GDPR, which starts in                 
May, a person is legally entitled to move his/her data from any one platform to another (called “data                  
mobility”) and he/she can request that companies delete all his/her data (“right to be forgotten”). Europe                
is leading the data creator centric model, and at PikcioChain we are hoping that other legislators will                 
follow this example. 
 
The fact that governments are putting such strong emphasis on user rights when it comes to personal                 
data shows the enormous value data holds for businesses. IBM CEO Ginny Rometty has famously said                
that “data is the oil of the 21st century”. However, as mentioned above, there are challenges that come                  
with “data mobility” and “the right to be forgotten”. In blockchain terms, no company that is storing                 
personal data or hashes of personal data can be fully compliant with GDPR, because of the simple fact                  
that you cannot delete an entry from a public chain, if a user demands his “right to be forgotten”.  
 
Also, the origin and authenticity of data can be difficult to confirm, leaving businesses vulnerable to fraud                 
and unable to value data with confidence. Given challenges with data authenticity, users have to provide                
their data numerous times with different companies and even numerous times at the same company for                
different processes. This is not only time consuming for the end user but also very expensive for the                  
company, given that the company in almost all cases is not a data authenticator at the core of their                   
business.  
 
Furthermore, today’s data ecosystem ignores the individual data producer. Their data is often used              
without compensation and leaves them with no knowledge of where their data is held. 
 
PikcioChain addresses all of these these challenges, creating a compliant and secure data ecosystem              
that delivers value and security to all participants, and leaves the individual in control of their data. 
 
PikcioChain has been designed to store, secure, verify and certify data while ensuring the data producer                
retains full control of their information at all times. PikcioChain lets the user choose how to share their                  
data, who to share it with, while also providing them with the opportunity to be compensated for its use.  
 
By empowering the individual, PikcioChain creates certainty for businesses. As the regulatory spotlight             
focuses on the data industry, companies need to find efficient ways to comply with new rules like the EU                   
GDPR directive, and they need to know that the data they’re buying is both authentic and legally                 
available. 
 
PikcioChain creates the trust that is needed to trade data securely. 
 
 

  

4 



 

Securing personal data 
The Problem 
A century ago the most valuable resource was oil. In the last decade a lucrative new commodity has                  
spawned; Data. The world's largest corporations collect, exchange and trade corporate, consumer- and             
metadata. Without the effective usage of this data companies such as Alphabet, Amazon, Apple and               
Facebook wouldn’t have been able to collectively make $25 billion in net profit in the first quarter of 2017                   
alone.  
 
Data security 
 
Due to the enormous value customer data represents for companies, a large amount of money is spent                 
each year securing data. According to Gartner, companies will spend up to $93 billion on information                
security in 2018. Per private record stolen, businesses can spend anywhere between $145 and $355               
while the average cost for large corporations of losing sensitive corporate or personal information is $4                
billion.  
 
The general problem is that centrally stored data is creating a giant honeypot for hackers to gain access                  
to and steal it. User data is stored in centralised systems, leaving the data at risk and the individual at the                     
mercy of corporations and hackers. 
 
Data security is not the only risk for businesses. When they buy or exchange data they have to rely on a                     
third party escrow, or trust each other. This creates friction in the data marketplace and reduces the                 
speed in which these transactions can be made. 
 
There are data exchange solutions out there, also in the blockchain space. However most of them rely                 
on centralised storage of data or they store customer data (or the hashes thereof) on a public ledger,                  
thereby creating regulatory issues. 
 
Regulatory considerations 
 
Governments all over the world have introduced or proposed legislations with regards to data privacy               
and storage. In recent years, legislations have been moving clearly in the direction of giving data                
ownership back to the people. That is especially visible in Europe, where with GDPR, which starts in May                  
2018, anyone is legally entitled to move personal data from any one platform to another (called “data                 
mobility”) and is able to request that companies delete all one’s data (“right to be forgotten”). Europe is                  
leading the data creator centric model, and at PikcioChain we are hoping that other legislators will follow                 
this example. 
 
There are many aspects and implications to these kinds of regulations. However most important with               
regards to data storage and exchange for platforms such as PikcioChain is that it prohibits making                
personal data public. This implies that storing personal data on a public blockchain actually violates               
these laws, even when the data is hashed or encrypted, as it still represents the same data. A distributed                   
public database or blockchain therefore can’t offer a proper solution, when the data is stored on the                 
public chain. Another aspect of GDPR is that customer data cannot be stored outside of the EU. A                  
worldwide, permission-free, public blockchain like Ethereum is not able to satisfy this regulatory demand.  
 
These are some of the reasons why many digital identity and data exchange platforms have failed. They                 
haven’t failed due to the technological aspects, but due to not adopting legislation and regulation.  

5 



 

GDPR explained 
 
The General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) (Regulation (EU) 2016/679) is a regulation by which              
the European Parliament, the Council of the European Union and the European Commission intend to               
strengthen and unify data protection for all individuals within the European Union (EU). It also               
addresses the export of personal data outside of the EU. The GDPR aims primarily to give control                 
back to citizens and residents over their personal data and to simplify the regulatory environment for                
international businesses by unifying the regulation within the EU. ​When the GDPR takes effect, it will                
replace the Data Protection Directive (officially Directive 95/46/EC) of 1995. The regulation was             
adopted on 27 April 2016. It will become enforceable on the 25th of May 2018 after a two-year                  
transition period and, unlike a directive, it does not require national governments to pass any enabling                
legislation, and is thus directly binding and applicable. 

 
Monetizing data 
 
Companies can sell user- or metadata. However, users don’t have the option to give permission if it is                  
sold, how often and to whom. And even if their data is sold, the company selling it is usually the only one                      
benefitting and there is currently no mechanism for the users to be compensated. 
 
When data is being sold, the parties involved want to be sure that the data is the original data and has                     
not been modified in any way. What is required is a way to know for sure, that it has been recorded and                      
stored in an immutable way. 
 
Friction due to inefficiencies 
 
Besides the mentioned current problems there is a lot of friction in the data sector. One of its causes is                    
that data is oftentimes not reused. For example, people have to re-submit their data to a variety of                  
organizations for KYC purposes (see an explanation of KYC below). This process takes more time than                
necessary for the users, it costs money to have the data verified multiple times and it costs resources for                   
the organizations or businesses that have to verify the users.  
 
All of these current problems can be solved with a well-designed decentralized data solution. 
 
KYC explained 
 
Know your Customer, or KYC in short, has been playing an ever increasing important role for large                 
institutions, governments and corporations.  
 
Whenever someone wants to open a bank account, or register an account (for example for a                
cryptocurrency exchange) they have to supply their information for the KYC process. This information              
usually consists of some data (name, birth place) and documents such as a copy of a passport and                  
utility bills. 
 
The data is then verified by, for instance, that bank or a third party KYC processor, after which their                   
identity is validated and the account can be opened. This process takes some time and is quite costly.                  
Moreover, it has to be redone for every bank, institution or organization, which is very inefficient.  

 

6 



 

The Solution 
Data, and also the verification of data itself, has real value when parties can exchange the data for                  
payments or allow other parties to reuse the verification of such data. 
 
Decentralized platforms today theoretically offer people and organizations the ability to securely store             
their data on the blockchain. Some projects even offer data monetization and exchange functionalities.  
 
What is missing is a decentralized data marketplace that does so in a fully regulatory compliant way.                 
Regulatory compliance isn’t something that projects can easily add in retrospect, as the problems often               
lie in the fundamental design of the system architecture. It has to be built in to the core system design of                     
a platform. 
 
General solution outline  
 
A peer to peer distributed blockchain solution offers the possibility to create such a platform. This system                 
would solve big problems for corporations and governmental organizations and would finally be a              
solution that they are allowed to use. A system where users store their encrypted data on their own                  
devices as to not bloat the blockchain and giving them full control over their data this way. So that they                    
can choose which data point they want to share with whom, or to whom to sell the data to. When users                     
own and store the data themselves it removes the giant honeypot and makes the system less                
susceptible to hackers and data leaks. This in turn saves organizations enormous amounts of resources               
and money each year. 
 
Furthermore, storing verification proofs and data in a decentralized manner offers high availability of such               
data, as when one node goes offline there are other nodes maintaining a copy. This also drastically                 
reduces the possibility of data loss. The best solution here is one where the owners of such data have                   
full control over who maintains a copy, even if it is just themselves. Flexibility is the key and without such                    
flexibility large corporations will find it hard to use such a system. 
 
Moreover, in traditional systems the involved parties never know for sure if the data they obtain or use                  
was the same data that was presented previously. They have to both trust the validity of the actual data                   
but also the transaction history of the data exchange. Using distributed ledger technology such as a                
blockchain for these purposes creates an immutable transaction history and allows for the storage of               
verification proofs, which in turn removes third party trust, removing friction from the data marketplace. 
 
Verification, validation or other data operations should be able to be reused in order to save time and                  
valuable resources for the users and organizations that deal with them. When data, or the verification of                 
such data, can be sold and resold multiple times, the original owner of that data should profit from every                   
transaction, together with the nodes that process such data. 
 
When a cryptocurrency is used for settlements on the platform this allows for immediate, frictionless,               
borderless transactions, removing the trust that is normally required when involving a third party in an                
exchange of value. 
 
Smart contracts on a distributed ledger offer the possibility to automate settlements and for organizations               
to create their own solutions. 
 
In order to create this solution PikcioChain has created its own proprietary blockchain solution. 
 
 

7 



 

The PikcioChain Solution  
 
PikcioChain is the first system designed specifically to give users and organizations the possibility to buy                
and sell not only data, but also to verify the data, and to sell and reuse the verification of these data.  
 
Peer to peer architecture 
 
One of the key features of PikcioChain is that the data is stored and transferred in a peer to peer way,                     
not on the open blockchain. Existing solutions store the data on public blockchains. This creates               
numerous problems. One of these problems is that it makes it impossible for the owners of data to                  
completely remove certain data. Another problem is that this does not comply with GDPR as the data is                  
on a public chain. PikcioChain only stores the hashes and validation of the data on the proprietary,                 
private, permission-based blockchain. This solves all these regulatory issues, allowing for mass adoption             
of the system. The basic idea is that the (original) owners of certain data can determine if only they                   
should be storing the data, or if certain trusted nodes can store a copy as well.  
 
PikcioChain lets businesses trade and exchange personal data in absolute security and with confidence,              
while simultaneously empowering individuals by giving them control of their own data and enabling them               
to monetize it. 
 
Data is sent to the PikcioChain and validator nodes validate the data and store a hash of this data on a                     
permissioned blockchain; the PikcioChain. The data, or even just the validator proof, can be offered on                
the PikcioChain data marketplace for (re)sale. This allows data that has once been verified to not have to                  
be verified again and again, but still be used in a secure way. 
 
PikcioChain’s Clearing House 
 
Whenever personal data is transacted within a customer’s network (i.e. between a bank and its               
customers), by definition value is exchanged. For example, when an identification process is executed,              
or a past verification is reused, personal data is transmitted. All parties involved are exchanging value in                 
the form of PKC, being the native currency of the network. PikcioChain is not the party charging for the                   
exchange of value, but it is rather the party that is keeping tab on each account, moving PKC with the                    
transfer of value. While other blockchain identity providers focus on B2C and charge “per login”,               
PikcioChain is uniquely positioned in the space by providing a data exchange service for businesses,               
providing the platform for data exchange, recording and storing data safely and managing the account               
balances while data is exchanged on the network. Clients have access to the account balances at any                 
point in time and compensate all parties accordingly in their chosen time intervals. 
 
Trust Capital Index 
 
From a security perspective, each separate party that validates the same piece, or collection of data, will                 
add an entry into the ledger for that data and will in effect create a sort of reputation of trustworthiness for                     
the data and the data owner. This reputation system is called the Trust Capital Index, or TCI in short. It is                     
a way for parties to judge the reliability of users and certain data on the system and to determine if                    
incoming data is trustworthy. 
 
GDPR compliance 
 
This mechanism of storing the data on personal devices and storing the hashes on a permissioned                
blockchain allows the system to be fully GDPR (regulatory) compliant. The GDPR legislation is taking               
effect in May 2018, and the technology to comply with the new legislation is lacking in today’s data                  
ecosystem. 

8 



 

Use Cases and benefits 
 
PikcioChain has been built to be datatype agnostic, so that it can handle a wide variety of use cases and                    
products. Broad classifications include corporate and personal data. Given that personal data has high              
value, the initial focus lies on this data type. PikcioChain solves the legislative, technological and               
important data privacy aspects and challenges. Most important use cases for personal data can be found                
in the banking, insurance and health care sector, however it is an open platform where corporations can                 
create their own solutions. 
 
PikcioChain is a fully-operational business with clients and a self-developed proven technology. Several             
essential smart contracts, including the KYC process and GDPR compliance, are ready for use and we                
have an existing B2C app in the in the Google PlayStore (​click here​). 
 
Some key benefits of PikcioChain: 

● Fraud proof in terms of altering data or transaction histories. Data is only being exchanged with 
the full permission of the data owner. 

● Data theft prevention through data storage decentralization. PikcioChain users store their data 
only on their own devices, rendering large scale theft of data impossible. 

● Speed of transactions: By using a third generation blockchain platform, PikcioChain is able to 
offer almost instant transactions. 

● Storing the data on users’ devices, while the hashes are stored on a permissioned blockchain, 
makes PikcioChain fully GDPR (and similar) compliant.  

● PikcioChain is currently a platform, aiming to transform into a protocol within the coming two 
years. By offering a library of modular smart contracts we will enable clients to build their own 
custom marketplace on top of the PikcioChain protocol. 

 
PikcioChain has built a suite of products for different target groups and use cases on top of the 
PikcioChain distributed ledger. The following chapter outlines the main use cases for which the products 
have been build, and the chapter thereafter will describe each of the products in detail. 

Use Cases 
 
PikcioChain can benefit a wide range of use cases across various data types and industry sectors.                
Historically, both the financial and medical services sector are faced with various challenges around              
personal data recording, management and legislation. For this reason PikcioChain has chosen these two              
sectors as its primary focus areas for its business approach. This chapter will first describe the two                 
primary sectors that PikcioChain is targeting and then focus on three of the use cases in those sectors. 

Financial Services 
 
The constant growth in regulatory requirements is seen as a burden by both clients and financial services                 
companies. As such, the repeated requests for KYC documentation that businesses must make of their               
existing and new clients are becoming a hindrance, damaging the client experience and creating a               
barrier of taking on new customers. 
 
One of the key factors behind the negative KYC experience for clients is that they have to keep providing                   
the same information, often in a manual format, to new institutions when they wish to become a client.                  
PikcioChain directly addresses this issue, creating a smooth and streamlined process for both client and               
company. 
 
Individual users are able to trust PikcioChain to transmit their relevant data securely to those companies                
they wish to do business with. They’re even able to instruct third parties to send their personal details to                   

9 

https://play.google.com/store/apps/details?id=com.matchupbox.pikcio&hl=en


 

other approved third parties in accordance with their wishes. This means that one bank can send                
approved client details to another bank that the client wishes to use for a loan, after the client gives                   
permission to the bank to do so. 
 
From the business perspective, the ability to securely receive certified client details will speed up the                
KYC process, improving customer onboarding and delivering a far better client experience while             
drastically reducing business costs. 

Medical Services 
 
The delivery of health and medical services increasingly takes place between institutions and even              
across national boundaries; however, the speed of care can be greatly affected by the slow delivery of                 
personal medical information. 
 
Whether it is in the event of an emergency or because a person is moving to a new area, the positive                     
identification of individuals and the timely arrival of medical records can mean the difference between               
positive and negative health outcomes. 
 
For the medical industry it can be a matter of life and death whether supplied data is accurate and can be                     
proven to have been verified in the past. 
 
PikcioChain can supply both certified identification records and medical data in a matter of seconds,               
providing comfort for the individual and the opportunity for the institution to deliver the highest standards                
of care. 
 

P2Link - Validating medical data 
As an example, PikcioChain is working together with a medical company called P2Link. They provide the                
monitoring and analysis of data for patients at risk of a heart attack. Patients have to supply P2Link with                   
medical data daily and by making use of PikcioChain P2Link can retroactively prove that the supplied                
data was in fact received at the time and valid.  
 
In general, in such a use case PikcioChain would be used to prove that certain data was received and                   
that the data was validated to be correct at that time. 
 

KYC - Know Your Customer 
With regards to KYC in particular, PikcioChain offers a KYC solution, where users upload their personal                
information and details to the PikcioChain. A trusted validator node, such as a bank, will process the                 
KYC information and once it has been verified it will upload hashes of the data to the PikcioChain. This is                    
done in a granular way as to make sure that if one document or piece of information is changed                   
(because of a new utility bill for instance), the hashes of the other data pieces still remain the same and                    
the data can still be reused, or sold.  
 
Whenever another party wants to use this KYC information they can receive the data from the user, hash                  
it and compare it to the hash on the blockchain. If it already exists they can see that it has been verified                      
before by trusted validator nodes and use that as a valid KYC. The more nodes that perform the KYC                   
process, in combination with the information which nodes validated (bank vs small organisation), the              
higher the “reputation” of that data. 
 
When it comes to facilitating KYC processes and reusing already submitted KYC data and its verification,                
the token sale process in the cryptocurrency sector seems to be an ideal field of application for an end                   

10 



 

user scenario. More details about the token sale use case can be found later in this chapter. 

Token Sales 
 
Today’s token sale process is anything but user friendly. Contributors have to provide their KYC               
documents and data separately for every token sale. Furthermore, they don’t know what happens with               
their data. Users will scramble to find the right token sale address and then sit in front of the computer to                     
hit the “send” button at the right second.  
 
All of this typically happens in very technical surroundings, such as MyEtherWallet and the blockchain               
explorers of NEO and Ethereum. PikcioChain intends to make token sales much more user friendly by                
creating the PikcioTokenSaleWallet (TSW). A wallet that allows for easy participation in token sales, a               
one-time KYC process that is then shared with the token sales the user wants to participate in and a                   
large amount of added functionality that will redefine the blockchain user experience. Find more details               
on this in the “PikcioTokenSaleWallet” chapter. 

PikcioChain Products 
The PikcioChain platform will be accessed through four products. These products have been designed              
for the purpose of providing the best possible interface and experience for the respective end user.  
 
Products and user group:  

● PikcioMe: For the individual users (suppliers of data)  
● PikcioPro: For the businesses (consumers of data)  
● PikcioLab: For the developers (designers of smart contracts) 
● PikcioTokenSaleWallet: For cryptocurrency enthusiasts (participants in token sales)  

PikcioMe 
PikcioMe is a personal application that the individual user installs on his or her own device (e.g. laptop,                  
smartphone). Each PikcioMe application works as the server for its registered user and, if permission is                
given, can act as a trusted server for other users as well. It is this decentralized server infrastructure that                   
puts individuals in control of their data and as there is no centralized 3rd party data storage PikcioMe                  
offers users a safe data storage solution. 
 
The PikcioMe application will also grant the user access to the PikcioChain            
platform. Through this platform the user will be able to exchange and certify             
his or her own personal data. Data exchange will be end-to-end encrypted            
whilst the encryption key is generated on the user’s device by the PikcioMe             
application, making the data exchange secure. 
 
Through the PikcioChain platform, PikcioMe allows for an easy way of data            
certification. Any individual user can choose to sent his or her own personal             
data in a secure way to a third party. This third party is then able to, with the                  
consent of the user, verify and certify all data sent. Consequently, it is the              
certification of this data, rather than the data itself, which is stored onto the              
PikcioChain.  
 
PikcioMe offers safe data storage, secure data exchange and easy data           
certification. An early version of the PikcioMe app is available and is already             
storing data securely on people’s devices at this time. It can be downloaded             
here: (​click​) 
 

11 

https://play.google.com/store/apps/details?id=com.matchupbox.pikcio&hl=en


 

 

PikcioPro 
Whereas the individual user will use PikcioMe, businesses will use PikcioPro to gain access to the                
PikcioChain platform. Utilising smart contracts, businesses can buy and sell certification data with the              
consent of the individual data owner.  
 
PikcioPro is a paid service which grants access to the Pikcio data exchange. User certification data for                 
KYC and other regulatory purposes can be exchanged using the PKC Token as a form of payment.                 
PikcioPro offers a reliable and confidential way of data exchange, knowing that smart contracts are               
upholding the demands and restrictions for the individual data owner. By using PikcioPro to buy or sell                 
certification data, businesses remove much of the risk associated with holding, buying, selling and              
exchanging personal data itself.  
 
Moreover, PikcioPro grants access to offer or use any smart contract service available on the               
PikcioChain platform. These smart contract services can range from small scale offers aimed at the               
individual data supplier to large scale commercial offers aimed at other businesses.  

PikcioLab 
The PikcioChain platform offers data exchange between individual users and companies through the             
PikcioMe and PikcioPro products. These transactions will be utilising smart contracts, creating a reliable              
and confidential manner of data exchange. PikcioLab is the product for smart contract developers. A tool                
for developers to build smart contracts running on the PikcioChain distributed ledger, creating a range of                
possibilities for both the individual user and companies connected to Pikcio.  

PikcioTokenSaleWallet (TSW) 
With the support of ​Onchain​, PikcioChain is currently finalizing a user friendly wallet to easily participate                
in upcoming token sales.  
 
PikcioChains TSW will have the following features for its users: 

● Create a profile and upload KYC documents, i.e. proof of identity and proof of residency               
documents 

○ Users will only have to perform this KYC process once. The KYC data and documents will                
then be linked to their token sale wallet for all future token sales 

● Easily participate in future token sales directly from within the KYC’ed token sale wallet 
● Create NEO and Ethereum wallets to fund a user’s TSW, or simply link existing NEO and                

Ethereum wallets to their TSW 
● Easily make transactions to and from their wallets 
● Send wire transfers to their TSW 
● Link your credit card to their TSW 
● View a list of upcoming token sales 
● Auto-oneclick-participate in token sales 
● Get alerts for upcoming token sales 
● Social network and news section highlighting interesting topics from  friends and crypto news 
● Recommend and share interesting token sales with friends 
● Encrypted chat with friends from within the TSW  

 
The PKC token plays a specific role in each of the PikcioChain products and use cases. By simply                  
paying a certain amount of PKC, or simply holding certain levels of PKC, users gain access to advanced                  
features on the platform. For the TokenSaleWallet it adds the following functionality and exemplary              
benefits to its users: 

● Access to exclusive token sales 

12 

http://www.onchain.com/en-us/


 

● Access to higher bonus tiers 
● Guaranteed allocations for chosen token sales 
● Higher allocations for chosen token sales 
● “Automated participation” feature enabled for chosen token sales 
● Participate in voting rounds on future token sales 

 
Overall the goal with the PikcioChain TSW is to allow users to easily discover interesting upcoming token                 
sales, learn about them and participate in a user friendly way. The end goal for PikcioChain TSW is for                   
token sale participation to be as easy as buying a product online. Select an interesting token sale, click                  
“participate” and proceed to checkout. As simple as that. These screenshots show the current stage of                
development of the TSW, it is being built on the foundation of PikcioMe.  

 
 
 
Menu and Profile: ​The menu bar to       
choose the different features can be      
found on the left side. Currently the profile        
section is displayed. Here the user can       
decide which data he/she wants to add to        
the profile and which data should be       
shared with contacts by clicking the green       
button next to the data 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Wallet: ​Here a user can receive and       
send tokens. They can choose who to       
send tokens to from their address book.       
In a later version it will list upcoming        
token sales and users can click on them        
to participate. 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
Friends and followers: ​The TSW has      
various social features, such as a friends       
lists. Here users are able to look at their         
friends’ profiles and activities. 
 
 
 
 
 

  

13 



 

 
 

 
 
 
 
 
Chat and file sharing: ​Chat with friends.       
Part of the chat functionality is a file        
sharing feature that allows sharing of files       
from a computer or which are already       
stored in the TSW. 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Social network and news: ​This is the       
social network and news page. It displays       
content shared by friends and can also       
show useful information about upcoming     
interesting token sales. All content such as       
videos or texts can be played directly in        
your TSW. 
 
 
 
 

  

14 



 

Competitor Comparison 
PikcioChain is aware of the competitive landscape and regularly analyzes strengths and weaknesses of              
relevant players. In summary, PikcioChain is confident about its offered services, proprietary blockchain             
technology, privacy and security aspects, attractive features for end users, technical development and             
the overall business approach. 

PikcioChain Competitor Comparison. All information to the best knowledge of PikcioChain, subject to             
change. We do not intent to misrepresent any other companies. “n/a” = information not available / not                 
provided in Whitepaper or by support. 

15 



 

PikcioChain Distributed Ledger 
Proof of Usage (PoU) Consensus Algorithm 
PikcioChain has created its own proprietary mining and consensus algorithm called Proof of Usage, or               
PoU in short. PoU is a combination of Proof of Work (PoW) and Proof of Stake (PoS), based on the work                     
of Bentov et al. on Proof of Activity (PoA).  
 
This chapter will describe Proof of Work (PoW) and Proof of Stake (PoS) and how they work. This is                   
followed by a description of Proof of Activity (PoA) and how PikcioChain modified it to get to a better                   
version for its purposes, PikcioChain’s proprietary ​Proof of Usage ​mining algorithm. 
 
Proof of Work 
 
PoW was introduced in the first blockchain model by Satoshi Nakamoto solving the double-spending              
attempts . The system is designed to allow network members to validate a transaction on the ledger. To                 1
write a new block, it is necessary to copy validated transactions on the ledger and additionally solve a                  
mathematical problem which is supposed to be solved in a given optimal time. Upon validation of a block,                  
the node (referred to as a miner) who solves the problem using the power of its computing device, is                   
remunerated with newly minted virtual currency units and/or transaction fees. This is defined as the               
network incentive. 
 
For a malicious party to modify the ledger, it would be necessary to delete a past transaction and replace                   
it with another one. This implies creating a longer chain than the “official” chain, because the new change                  
increases the chain’s complexity. The malicious party then needs to solve the proof of the work of the                  
newly forged block and catch up with the work done by all the other nodes of the network. Therefore, the                    
computing effort for a malicious party to modify the ledger has to support more than 51% of the global                   
computing power on the network, otherwise the malicious edit will be identified and ignored by the                
majority of nodes. 
 
The objective of such consensus mechanism is to render complex and expensive block validations to               
secure transactions. Moreover the incentive mechanism underlying PoW has been proven to be efficient              
for incentivizing and building a miner network, enabling a fast and sustainable infrastructure. 
 
How it works 
 
Each miner collects and validates transactions that are broadcasted over the network. A transaction is               
validated when the signature is proven correct by comparing the public key of the buyer to the                 
signature issued by its private key, and checking whether the current balance can cover the transacted                
value. The miner uses his computing power trying to generate a block by guessing a hash by brute                  
force. The hash is a function of a given set of data including the transactions, the hash of the previous                    
block, his public key address, and a calculated nonce.  
 
When a miner finds a hash matching the current difficulty, i.e. N zeros in the calculated hash adjusted                  
with the nonce, the sealed block is broadcasted on the network. 
 
In case other miners see the sealed block as valid, i.e. the calculated nonce fits the level of hash                   
difficulty, they then move on to the next block extending the blockchain. 
 

1 ​https://bitcoin.org/bitcoin.pdf  

16 

https://bitcoin.org/bitcoin.pdf


 

The block reward (newly minted coins) and / or the fees from the transactions that the miner collected                  
are credited to his or her public address. 
 
The difficulty level readjusts according to the mining power that is participating in the network. This is                 
done by updating the hash target value every X blocks, so that blocks get generated every Y unit of                   
time on average (for Bitcoin X is 2016 and Y is 10 minutes) 
 
Usually the block rewards starts at a certain given value and halves after certain periods, in order to                  
make the block rewards play a less important role and give more importance to the transaction fees as                  
the main means of rewarding the miners. 

 
Proof of Stake explained 
 
The most important fact about choosing a Proof of Stake (PoS) algorithm over a Proof of Work (PoW)                  
algorithm, as in the Bitcoin blockchain, is the energy consumption considerations . Running the Bitcoin              2
protocol is a very expensive effort which uses large amounts of energy. The energy requirements for                
running the PoW protocol continue to grow as more and more miners join the pool and their computing                  
resources increase. In addition, more energy is needed as the difficulty increases. 
 
The core idea of Proof of Stake is that instead of wasting electricity on finding the hashes by brute force,                    
a node is selected to generate a new block with a probability proportional to the amount of coins in his                    
possession. If a node has a positive stake, it is called a stakeholder. The network runs a lottery,                  
supported by all stakeholders, to decide who will seal the block, and system participants are exclusively                
and automatically entered into that lottery in direct proportion to their total stake in the network. As with                  
Bitcoin the chosen node is rewarded with newly minted coins and / or transaction fees. 
 
Proof of Stake: How it works 
 
Time is divided into subsets of N minutes. Each subset is composed of M timeslots, each of X seconds                   
e.g 20 seconds. During a given N subset, stakeholders select M random numbers for M timeslots from                 
0 to the total network stake expressed in the least value that the coin can take e.g. the satoshi in                    
Bitcoin (1 BTC = 100’000’000). The selection process is only open to a stakeholder satisfying a given                 
threshold e.g. 2% of the total stake, defined as electors. 
 
Each elector stakeholder issues their random set of M satoshi numbers to other electors. The vote is                 
attached to a signature to justify ownership using the electors private key. Accordingly to all shared                
and validated votes after closing of the voting session, M random seeds are derived. 
 
A given seed is the identifier of the selected satoshi. The rightful current owner of the selected satoshi                  
is identified by the FTS follow-the-satoshi algorithm. Thus, the current holder of the satoshi will be the                 
elected closing node for the block in the related timeslot. 
 
Each stakeholder collects and validates transactions that are broadcasted over the network to accept              
or refuse incoming blocks from selected nodes. 
The block reward (newly minted coins) and / or the transaction fees that the selected node collected                 
are credited on to its public address. 
 

 
 

2 ​https://eprint.iacr.org/2016/889.pdf  

17 

https://eprint.iacr.org/2016/889.pdf


 

Proof of Activity 
 
Proof of Activity (PoA) was introduced by Bentov et al. when merging the concepts of POW & PoS, and                   3
adding a redistribution of the earned rewards to a set of randomly selected stakeholders. 
 

Proof of Work specifications 
 
The miner uses his computing power trying to generate a block header by repeated calls of a                 
hash function on a given set of data, including the hash of the previous block, his public key                  
address, height relative to the genesis block, i.e. the index of the block in the blockchain, and a                  
calculated nonce. The hash does not reference the transactions. 

 
Proof of Stake specifications 
 
All the network nodes regard the hash of this block header as data that deterministically derives N                 
pseudorandom stakeholders. The derivation is done by concentrating this hash with the hash of              
the previous block and with N fixed suffix values, then hashing each combination, and then               
invoking follow-the-satoshi with each of the N hashes as input. Each selected stakeholder signs              
the block header, one after another. The M​th selected stakeholder includes all the transactions              
within a given time range and seals the block with the signature. The transaction fees and / or                  
minted coins collected by the M​th selected stakeholder are redistributed between the miner and              
the M selected stakeholders. 

 
Consensus Analysis 
 
Proof of Work is surely a reliable protocol when it comes to a fully public blockchain, trying to cope with                    
various parties working for their own interest, while sustaining a shared infrastructure. On the other hand                
generally proof of work wastes a lot of energy and resources. However, this is done to artificially increase                  
the difficulty to linearize block validation overtime. Proof of Activity improves this aspect with a single fast                 
forward PoW at block initialization independent from blocktimes. 
 
Most people perceive Proof of Stake as an improvement of Proof of Work. However, we view it as an                   
alternative for less computational effort and a strong incentivization of the current larger stakeholders. In               
comparison PoW offers newcomers the same rights to compete using their computational power. PoS is               
designed to run on a large set of stakeholders, with coins rightfully disseminated in order to avoid nodes                  
enriching themselves by earning and stacking too much. Indeed PoS encourages stakeholders to keep              
their wealth in place, raising their probability to earn newly minted coins and / or transaction fees. 
 
Proof of Activity balances the PoW incentivization while sustaining stakeholders as pillars of the network.               
Moreover the PoW process plays a smaller role, making it more efficient. The reason that PoW is more                  
efficient in the PoA model is that traditional PoW implementations always aim for the same average                
blocktimes. With an increasing amount of computational hardware being added to the network, the              
difficulty has to eventually increase in order to get to the same blocktimes. In PoA the PoW difficulty does                   
not increase over time and it takes around 10 seconds to get the nonce (not 10 minutes such as in                    
Bitcoin). And whenever a nonce is found, transactions can continue for 10 minutes. So the Proof of Work                  
only exists to bootstrap the next 10 minute phase in PoA. In the end PoA ensures that the right                   
incentives exist for the computational resources for PoW, while saving a lot of resources and the                
environment. Meanwhile the stakeholders are getting a share of the mining rewards.  
 
PoW, PoS and PoA all want to reward miners and stakeholders in order to realize multiparty                
computation. But when looking for the best blockchain solutions, it is not only important to look at the                  

3 ​https://www.decred.org/research/bentov2014.pdf  

18 

https://www.decred.org/research/bentov2014.pdf


 

infrastructure they provide, but to also judge them from the usage perspective. When a business               
revolves around data generation it’s very important which infrastructure is used and how it is               
implemented, so these 2 aspects cannot be separated from one another. 
 
The need for a new model 
 
The consensus mechanism is the underlying process on which distributed ledgers rely. Therefore, the              
first objective is to insure that various parties inter-operate as a whole to sustain a reliable and safe                  
network. PoU (Proof of Usage) is introduced as it is fundamental for Pikciochain to build an incentive                 
model where data owners, e.g. individuals, will be rewarded. Indeed current models around personal              
data monetization do not encompass users i.e. rightful data owners. Additionally the objective would be               
to overcome the stacking effect from PoS to encourage usage by spending over retention. 
 
Proof of Usage 
 
Proof of Usage aims to a build a tangible ground for data provision, certification and exchange in the                  
PikcioChain. PoU relies on the same core process as PoA, but with an additional redistribution layer to                 
original data owners and / or certifiers. It also uses a last-block-satoshi method instead of the                
follow-the-satoshi, to speed up and linearize the time spent finding who is the current satoshi owner from                 
the total satoshis exchanged in the block. Additionally PoU does not incentivize stakeholders to hoard               
the coins, but rather to use them, while also avoiding self rewarding. Therefore having a platform that                 
revolves around the transactions of data implies a business model of payment incentives with              
redistribution of rewards at the consensus level. 
 
Proof of Usage: How it works 
 
Because follow-the-satoshi selects a random coin number, it incentivizes miners to increase their             
stacks as to increase their chances of getting the rewards. This effectively incentivizes hoarding v.s.               
spending. Proof of Usage uses a follow-the-satoshi-in-block, meaning a coin will be selected in the last                
blocks randomly from past transactions within the last N blocks. Therefore the identification of the               
owner for whom the coin was selected will be faster and only the transacted coins will be taken into                   
consideration. Coins sent to yourself are not included in order to prevent self-rewarding. And even if an                 
actor would try and game this by sending tokens to wallets he owns he will end up spending more in                    
transaction fees than he would get. 
 
Time is divided into subsets called time slots. For a given time slot a block header is defined using the                    
hash of the previous block, the miner’s public address, the height relative to the block index and a                  
calculated nonce for a given difficulty proven fast enough to avoid computational effort losses. When a                
miner reaches a hash matching the current difficulty i.e. N zeros in the calculated hash adjusted with                 
the nonce, the block header is broadcasted on the network. The header hash is derived N times for N                   
satoshi within last X block transactions. 
 
Each selected stakeholder signs the block header, collects and validates transactions that are             
broadcasted over the network to accept or refuse incoming blocks from the winning miner. Once the                
timeslot reaches the end time, the miner wraps up the block and redistributes the fees. Pikcio                
Company gets the transaction fees for the transactions including the N satoshi . Thus split M% to all                  
data owners and certifiers for who a PKC exchange occurred. The miner himself gets X% of the                 
remaining transaction fees. Each stakeholder is credited of Y/N% of the remaining transaction fees. 

19 



 

The PKC token 
As PikcioChain is a proprietary distributed ledger solution, it has its own token called the PKC token. This                  
is the basic unit of account inside the system and it forms the lifeblood of the PikcioChain ecosystem.  
 
NEO token 
European companies require a banking license to issue their own tokens. A banking license takes two                
years and an investment of 15.000.000 Euro. It was therefore clear that PikcioChain would initially               
choose a 3rd party blockchain platform for issuing the PKC tokens on their behalf. The decision was                 
finally made for the NEO platform (read more on this in the chapter (“NEO”). Therefore, PKC is currently                  
a NEO (NEP-5) token. The objective is to launch a PikcioChain native token when regulations are more                 
favourable in the fast-evolving European fintech legislation framework. 
 
PKC is PikcioChain’s proprietary currency 
PKC can be used in a similar way to a proprietary currency within the PikcioChain network. When used                  
in this way, it can be a medium of exchange facilitating the trade of data, functionality and access. 
 
Businesses can use PKC tokens to purchase customer data along with their proof of authenticity and                
integrity. PKC tokens can also provide access to identification validation from third parties (i.e. banks)               
that have already processed the requested KYC data. In addition, PKC tokens will grant users the right to                  
deploy their own smart contracts and execute them in the safe and modular blockchain environment               
provided by PikcioChain. 
 
PKC is used for incentivization 
PKC can also be used as an incentive for ecosystem participants, i.e. to incentivize data producers to                 
keep their data up to date and to share their data with organizations. Another example are miners who                  
are incentivized to execute a smart contract and being rewarded with a share of the PKC tokens per                  
transaction. 
 
PKC is sold at a premium to business clients 
The PKC token will also be sold on the platform by the PikcioChain company to larger parties at a slight                    
premium above market prices for convenience. This premium allows the company to make a slight profit,                
but also to restock - and even add to - its inventory of PKC, by restocking them from the open market. 
 
PKC is used as incentives and to add functionality  
The PikcioChain platform, as well as its products address different use cases and user groups (see                
“PikcioChain Products” for more details). For each of these use cases or applications the PKC token can                 
offer specific utilities and functionalities.  
 
One example of this is the PikcioTokenSaleWallet (TSW) product, which offers a user-friendly way to               
participate in various token sales without having to go through the cumbersome KYC process every time.                
Dependant on the amount of PKC held by the user in his/her TSW wallet, or paying PKC for advanced                   
features, some of the following benefits can be enjoyed: 

● Access to exclusive token sales or tiers 
● Access to higher bonus tiers 
● Guaranteed allocations for chosen token sales 
● Higher allocations for chosen token sales 
● “Automated participation” feature enabled for chosen token sales 
● Participate in voting rounds on which future token sales to add to the platform 

 
These basic dimensions can be customized by the project that is offering their sale via the TSW, leading                  
to a wide range of incentives offered to PKC holders. 

20 



 

Go To Market Strategy 
 
B2B2C Approach 
 
While most competitors are focusing on the B2C (business to consumer) aspect of identity data               
management, effectively growing their data pool by positioning their identity management front end in a               
very competitive B2C market, for example via app, PikcioChain covers a B2B2C (business to business to                
consumer) approach. This means that PikcioChain is combining its strength with its business partners              
and clients to build up their customer data pool. The services, websites, portals and solutions of are the                  
front end to grow the data pool. PikcioChain is effectively the background mechanism in for handling all                 
customer related data, thereby leveraging the immense customer base that the clients have. This makes               
growing the data pool highly effective and it then comes very naturally for the B2C part to engage with                   
the individual data owner via the app. 
  
While PikcioChain is more than just identity management, it is the use case that our clients in the                  
banking and insurance sector have the highest need for at the moment. PikcioChain is a client driven                 
company and therefore it makes sense to grow the business in the areas and markets where the need to                   
comply with certain regulations is the strongest. 
 
Regional expansion strategy 
 
Given the team’s background negotiations with various major French banks are ongoing and we are               
delivering most of the client work for BNP Paribas in France. Further client rollouts to other European                 
countries are planned in the near future.  
 
PikcioChain is looking to strategically position sales offices and showrooms near key markets where              
businesses can experience the solutions first hand. Pikcio AG is headquartered in Lausanne,             
Switzerland with offices in Paris, Brussels and Boston (USA). A sales office in Bahrain is staffed and                 
operating, while a subsidiary in China is currently being set up and the Chinese organization is in the                  
process of being incorporated. We are looking to open an office in Brussels for strategic access to                 
Luxembourg. With PikcioChains great connections to the Malaysian government and its positive stance             
towards blockchain, PikcioChain is set to open a subsidiary in Kuala Lumpur by the end of summer 2018                  
The goal is to gather a consortium of banks around the PikcioChain products to create a strong                 
ecosystem. And finally PikcioChain is entering Japan, piloting one of our products for several local banks                
and reviewing the option of opening a Japanese subsidiary by the end of the year.  
 
National Connector Strategy 
 
The first step in approaching a new market is to build up connections that are specifically designed to                  
fulfill regulatory demands of the target market and then grow existing customer connections as well as                
establishing new ones with a plug and play style concept. Due to PikcioChain’s unique Go To Market                 
strategy, B2B promotion is the most effective tool of advertisement. PikcioChain will present itself at               
business sector events in key markets around the globe and leverage its strong partnership network.               
Furthermore, the partners themselves will act as resellers of PikcioChain and as support for technical               
implementations, ensuring steady growth and almost limitless global scaling capabilities. 
 
Whenever new clients are onboarded, they will require PKC Tokens to use the PikcioChain services.               
While most of the clients won’t buy PKC on exchanges, they will however buy PKC from the “B2B                  
premium inventory” at a premium rate in comparison to the price of PKC on exchanges. PikcioChain then                 

21 



 

in turn reserves the right to restock this inventory by buying PKC from exchanges, in order to satisfy                  
demand in the future. 
 
B2C Incentives Campaigns 
 
Other promotional tools are the B2C growth pool to drive regular users to use the Pikcio.me app or the                   
PKC Token Sale Wallet, where people can gain access to PKC by performing actions on the PKC                 
network. There are many effective ways of incentivizing B2B as well as B2C actions and we assume the                  
community will be happy to see that all areas are covered. 

Strategic Blockchain Partners 
When we think about partnerships, we believe that what keeps them together is not just striving towards                 
one common goals, but also towards a shared vision of a better future. The partners we are contacting                  
are ones with the same passion, the same value systems and the same understanding of how the world                  
works. The goal for these partnerships is to last a lifetime. PikcioChain is therefore selecting its partners                 
very carefully. This chapter aims to provide details about partners in the blockchain space and traditional                
business fields. 

NEO 
 
 
 
 
 
For people in the cryptocurrency space, it has become obvious that NEO has been trying to develop a                  
carefully designed ecosystem. They have strategically partnered with companies to cover key use cases,              
industry verticals and geographies. Meanwhile NEO itself is successfully focusing on stability, scalability,             
transaction speed and functionality in order to provide a platform for a strong ecosystem. 
 
In September 2017 PikcioChain’s friend and advisor, Joe Zhou, introduced us to Da Hongfei, NEO’s               
CEO. This has lead to a $3 million contribution by the NEO Council into the PikcioChain ecosystem and                  
PikcioChain becoming an integral part of the NEO ecosystem. PikcioChain is the first and so far only                 
European company NEO has invested in; PikcioChain is positioned as the data protocol and data               
exchange for the NEO ecosystem. 
 
Why did PikcioChain choose NEO over i.e. Ethereum or Hyperledger? 
 

● NEO, Ethereum or Hyperledger were some of the obvious options besides various other             
blockchain platforms. 

● Hyperledger only uses IBM servers to store and certify data, meaning that users have to trust                
IBM. This is not in harmony with our understanding of a distributed ledger. 

● Compared to Hyperledger, Ethereum’s architecture is used and owned by several companies.            
However, when data is sent to the Ethereum blockchain, the user does not know where their data                 
has gone. Ethereum is a permissionless network, which is in direct conflict with EU regulations.               
EU regulations dictate that data and even the data hashes cannot be stored in countries outside                
of the EU. This makes permissionless networks like Ethereum unsuitable for certain highly             
regulated industries such as the health and financial services sectors. 

● Many companies in the banking space have previously chosen Hyperledger or Ethereum as a              
platform and have failed. This was not due to technical reasons, but due to regulations that                

22 



 

require a permission-based chain like NEO and PikcioChain. PikcioChain is an application for the              
real world and for real clients that need to comply to the policies and regulations.  

● NEO is a permissionless public network. Permission can be achieved using encryption such as              
with quorum on Ethereum. This allows for permission from an application perspective, but not              
from a system architecture. That’s why the best of both worlds are combined when using NEO in                 
combination with the permission-based PikcioChain. NEO has a theoretical maximum of about            
10.000 transactions per second (TPS), a high throughput when compared to other platforms, i.e.              
Ethereum currently has 15 TPS. High TPS can be an important criteria for some client use cases                 
and does not limit PikcioChain’s applicability for businesses. Furthermore, PikcioChain has           
developed good relations with the leaders of the NEO ecosystem. PikcioChain’s strategic            
partnership with NEO implies a strong communication that goes both ways, as NEO is highly               
interested in actively advancing its ecosystem via its strategic partners. All these factors have              
been central in our decision for the NEO ecosystem. 

 
What did the strategic agreement between PikcioChain and NEO entail? 
 
Both parties signed a strategic agreement that includes: 

● 3.000.000 USD contribution into the PikcioChain ecosystem by the NEO Council  
● PikcioChain moves exclusively to the NEO platform, PKC is a NEP-5 utility token 
● NEO technically supports the token sale, i.e. writing the PikcioChain token sale contract 
● PikcioChain receives access to all of NEO’s marketing platforms, be it social media, speaking at               

meetups or presenting at NEO’s conferences and roadshows 
● Mutual support in business development, first concrete steps being roadshows  

○ NEO, Onchain and Ontology will do roadshows with PikcioChain in China to introduce             
their large partner and client network to PikcioChain’s unique products  

○ PikcioChain will do respective roadshows in Europe with NEO, Onchain and Ontology,            
including introductions to various potential partners and clients in the banking and            
insurance sector. 

Building key partnerships: Onchain & Ontology 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On a management level PikcioChain is in direct contact with  
 

● Da Hongfei, founder of NEO and co-founder of Onchain 
● Jun Li, co-founder of Onchain and founder of Ontology 

 
Close partnerships with both Onchain and Ontology are currently being built to establish a mutually               
beneficial exchange of technology and services.  
 
Onchain is the corporation behind NEO. Onchain’s product “DNA” (Distributed Networks Architecture) is             
based on digital asset applications and capable of flexible expansion into multiple business support              
scenarios. Expressed differently: “Onchain = Microsoft of blockchain. DNA = Windows 1.0”  .  4

4 ​Source and good resource to learn more about NEO and the close ties to the Onchain company:                  
https://hackernoon.com/neo-onchain-and-its-ultimate-plan-dna-4c33e9b6bfaa 

23 

https://hackernoon.com/neo-onchain-and-its-ultimate-plan-dna-4c33e9b6bfaa


 

Onchain and PikcioChain are interested in closely cooperating on various aspects such as network              
security and end user services. 
 
As a mission statement, Ontology is looking to build a cross-chain, peer-to-peer, trustless ecosystem.              
Essentially, the goal is to create interoperability between different chains. A central interoperability use              
case is data interoperability, specifically sending personal data from one chain to another chain while the                
data remains fully functional. We are in close contact with Jun Li, founder of Ontology, about the transfer                  
of personal data cross chains, a topic of mutually high interest. 

Strategic Business Partners 

  
 
In just three years, PikcioChain has been recognized as an elegant solution to a complex problem. The                 
core value of ensuring privacy by design has been understood by many to represent the future of the                  
data industry. Its implementation within PikcioChain has led to a range of operational partnerships with               
major businesses that have the power to change the way millions of people think about and use their                  
personal data. 
 
Besides key partnerships in the cryptocurrency space, we strategically selected partners that have their              
roots within traditional business sectors since we are a B2B2C company above all else. To understand                
how we leverage these partnerships we want to introduce these partnerships in more detail. 

E&Y 
E&Y (former Ernst&Young) is a global powerhouse and one of the largest professional services firms in                
the world ranking among the "Big Four" accounting firms. They operate a network of member firms with                 
over 231,000 employees in over 700 offices in more than 150 countries. With this global setup they are                  
offering PikcioChain to companies that are currently struggling to comply with GDPR regulations and              
position us as the go-to solution when it comes to handling customer data. Furthermore they bring in                 
direct contacts with clients and are securing speaking slots in events, to present PikcioChain in front of                 
key decision makers. The network effect for PikcioChain within this constellation is immeasurable.  

PricewaterhouseCoopers  
PricewaterhouseCoopers is our second partner out of the “Big Four” accounting firms, with a network of                
offices in 157 countries, a combined 743 locations and over 223.000 employees. They are playing a                
major part when it comes to raising funds for the token sale in Europe and Russia. Furthermore they are                   
performing due diligence tasks for PikcioChain, take care of the financial side of the Token Sale and                 
consult in specific parts for the Whitepaper.  
PWC is not only limited to the business aspects of PikcioChain but also advises when it comes to the                   
technological side of the project, checking the token status and auditing the PKC smart contract, before                
presenting us in front of their clients to raise funds in the Token Sale.  

24 



 

Capgemini 
Not as big but still a huge multinational player is Capgemini, a France based services and business                 
consulting corporation. They bring an additional 190.000 employees in over 40 countries and more that               
50 years of experience to the table. Both E&Y and Capgemini play an integral part within our business                  
strategy. They offer a vast client network for us to access. But while E&Y is more focussed on the                   
business support, the partnership with Capgemini goes even further beyond that. They play the role of a                 
global technical integrator for PikcioChain. If successfully positioned, they will act as a partner for               
technical implementation, resulting in global capabilities to scale up that wouldn’t be possible otherwise. 
 
PikcioChain offers a solution for the global exchange of customer data and therefore has a potential                
world wide client base. This sets the demand for business partners that can act locally but think and                  
deliver globally. With the current set of partners we are confident that we are more than prepared for the                   
tasks ahead. Each of our partners is fulfilling a slightly different but crucial role for the benefit of                  
PickcioChain and its clients and supporters. 

Clients 
PikcioChain has several ongoing, paid client engagements. The company is actively working on widening              
the current client contracts and is in talks with several potential clients in the banking sector. 
 

 

 

 

BNP Paribas - Cetelem 
BNP’s ​Cetelem​ (personal credit subsidiary) contracted PikcioChain for the following services: 

● A mobile solution for KYC info collection 
● Collection and authentication (proof of residency and proof of revenue) is integrated into a              

chatbot for personalized customer communication, allowing for a streamlined online credit           
request process 

BNP Paribas - Cardiff 
BNP’s ​Cardiff​ insurance has access to the above mentioned data of the insured credit user, which is 
connected to four different data sources for claim authentication, allowing for a faster and less expensive 
underwriting process. 
 
GDPR compliance for customer data access and control is guaranteed via the PikcioChain. Business 
with BNP Paribas is steadily growing. 

P2link 

P2Link is a telemedicine service provider. PikcioChain is connecting patient data from the patient’s home 
with the P2Link caregivers, creating a redundant network ensuring a trustable fallback for all data entries. 

25 



 

Awards 
PikcioChain has successfully participated in various startup competitions and sector specific award            
programs. The positive results have helped us gain visibility among potential partners and clients. 
 

 

LA FRENCH TECH (2015) 
 
Received label “certified 
FrenchTech”, given to a selection 
of innovative startups. 

INTERNATIONAL CES (2017) 
 
Prize winner of “One billion dollar pitch” run 
by the FrenchTech community 

 

3D FINTECH CHALLENGE 
(2016) 
 
Finalist of the 3D Fintech 
Challenge run by Dassault 
Systèmes 

FACC INNOVATION AWARDS (2016) 
 
Silver Medal of the Innovation Awards at 
the French American Chambers of 
Commerce in New England 

 
F10 FINTECH CHALLENGE 
(2016) 
 
Finalist of the F10 Fintech 
Challenge ran by the Swiss based 
group SIX 

GRANDS PRIX (2017) 
 
Grand Prize Bank & Innovation in the 
Blockchain category with Flatirons Jouve 

Accelerators 
Start-up accelerators, also known as seed accelerators, are fixed-term, cohort-based programs, that            
include mentorship and educational components as well as networking opportunities. Unlike business            
incubator​s​, the application process for start-up accelerators is open to anyone, but highly competitive.              
PikcioChain has become part of a range of accelerators in various regions, giving access to a global                 
network of business partners and influencers. 

 

 

  

 

  

 

 

 

TECHCODE 
 
TechCode is a leading 
overseas accelerator. It has 
established incubation 
systems in Beijing, 
Shanghai, Shenzhen, Gu’an, 
Silicon Valley, Seoul, Tel 
Aviv, and Berlin to provide 
innovators with a global 
support network. 
 

PLUG & PLAY 
 
Plug and Play is BNP 
Paribas’ startup accelerator, 
being the ultimate fintech 
and insurtech accelerator in 
Paris. BNP Paribas-Plug and 
Play is bringing the ultimate 
innovation platform to Paris. 
Uniting startups with the 
unrivaled tech expertise of 
Silicon Valley and the bank 
for a changing world. 
 

DIGITAL CREDIT 
UNION FINTECH 
An innovation center 
dedicated to fostering 
seed-stage FinTech startups 
and the Boston FinTech 
community. The DCU 
FinTech Innovation Center is 
a dedicated resource 
providing seed-stage 
FinTech startups with 
everything they need for 
success: mentorship, 
workspace, a professional 
network, and community. 

FINTECH BAY 
 
Bahrain FinTech Bay is the 
leading FinTech Hub in the 
Middle East, providing 
innovation labs, acceleration 
programmes, curated 
activities, educational 
opportunities, and a 
collaborative platform to 
source partners, investors, 
talent and build a regional 
network. 
 

26 



 

Use of Proceeds 
 

27 



 

Roadmap 
PikcioChain started out in 2014 with the idea of building “The Bitcoin of data”, purely focussing on a                  
Peer-2-Peer architecture. The design of these P2P design layers took 1.5 years, including indexation of               
data, users and devices. 1 year ago the blockchain layer with the consensus algorithm and a DLT was                  
added and is now fully functional and in use at BNP Paribas and other clients. Currently the technical                  
team is focusing on implementing PikcioChain’s proprietary Proof of Activity algorithm (mixture of POW &               
POS). Also, the team is working on implementing smart contracts on the PikcioChain.  
 

● Jun 2014: Self funded, 750k USD invested into the company by PikcioChain CEO Didier and               
close friends into development of PikcioChain. Goal: To build the “Bitcoin of personal data”.  

● Oct 2014: MatchUpBox established with offices in France and the US. Build up company              
structure, hire team. 

● Jan 2015: Start of development, network design, solution concept. 
● Sep 2015: First PikcioChain prototype including chat, message exchange, P2P layer, including            

network encryption. 
● Oct 2015: Development of proprietary distributed ledger technology, distribution of data,           

connectors for Facebook, LinkedIn and other social networks as well as banks. 
● Jul 2016: Preparation for first official release, work on PikcioMe interface, basis for first mobile               

application. 
● Jan 2017: Presentation of consumer friendly PikcioMe solution at Consumer Electronic Show in             

Las Vegas. Received major attention from the fintech sector. Won price for “Billion dollar Pitch”. 
● Feb 2017: Development of APIs for easy integration into other client application. Started work on               

consensus algorithm, PikcioChain’s custom Proof of Work model. 
● Oct 2017: First major client BNP Paribas was signed and work for prototype started. Other client                

work in parallel. 
● Nov 2017: DePikcio AG incorporated in Lausanne, Switzerland. 
● Dec 2017: Testnet release of PikcioMe Wallet (laptop and Android platforms). Setup the first              

medium-sized PikcioChain infrastructure for BNP Paribas. 
● Dec 2017: NEO partnership and PKC become NEP-5 tokens. 
● Feb 2018: Design of MIP (Miner Incentive Program). The program is designed to attract miners               

worldwide to help grow the PikcioChain network and infrastructure.  
● Mar 2018: Release of PikcioChain’s Proof of Activity Protocol. 
● Mar 2018: PikcioTokenSaleWallet: Registration process for new wallet, create profile, upload           

KYC documents, check of proof of identity and proof of residency documents. 
● May 2018: PikcioTokenSaleWallet: Add new crypto wallet (ETH, NEO), import existing crypto            

wallet, make transactions from/to wallet, send wire transfer to wallet, add credit card to wallet. 
● Q2 2018: Release of PikcioLab (smart contract builder), allowing to push programs to the              

PikcioChain.  
● Q2 2018: Hybrid application of the PikcioChain iOS Wallet, partly P2P, partly using relays. 
● Q2 2018: Execute Pikcio MIP (miner-incentive program), to attract miners worldwide to help grow              

the PikcioChain network and infrastructure. 
● TBD: Full P2P release of the PikcioChain iOS Wallet 

28 



 

 

PikcioChain Team  
 
Pikcio AG, the company which owns and develops the Pikcio network was founded by Didier Collin de 
Casaubon, Fabien Bucamp and Dr. Jorick Lartigau PhD. Information about the founders’ careers and the 
rest of the Pikcio team, can be found below: 
 

Leadership Team 
 Didier Collin De Casaubon - Founder, CEO 

After achieving a post-grad in Philosophy, a masters in Mathematics and an MBA, 
Didier juggled working in the banking industry for over 15 years with his ambitions to 
be software entrepreneur. His understanding of financial services along with his 
technical expertise have helped him guide the development of Pikcio. 

 Fabien Bucamp - Co-Founder, CTO 
Fabien’s network security background working at the French Department of Defence 
makes him the perfect person to oversee the monitoring and management of our 
software and hardware development work. 

 Dr. Jorick Lartigau, PhD - Co-Founder, Research 
Jorick leads research into Pikcio, conceptualising and designing new features for the 
service. His PhD in Computer Science focused on data security and big data 
algorithms. 

 
 
 
 
 

Alizon König - Development 
Alizon spends hours every day coding the engine behind Pikciochain. She ensures 
that bugs big and small are identified and resolved, making Pikcio an incredibly 
reliable service. 

 

Gonzague Grandval - Strategy 
Gonzague received his post-graduate diploma in Economics at the Sorbonne. Since 
then he has focused his career on cryptocurrency and blockchain technologies. 
 

 

Jean-François Lienart - Chief Sales Officer 
Jean-Francois has built up a strong track record in selling IT services solutions to the 
Benelux market. He specialises in sourcing and implementing new technologies to 
generate growth within large organizations. 
 

29 



 

 

 Cherie Arruda - Co-Founder, Plan & Audits   
Cherie built a successful 26 year career in financial services working at a large US               
bank. She brings her executive leadership in business controls, risk management           
and compliance to the Pikcio team. 
 

 Delphine Benat-Rassat - Operations  
Delphine with her Master in Business Management also has a multisector 
background in particular in innovative companies. She deals with operations and 
helps Matchupbox in optimizing its administrative, HR and financial processes. 
 
 

 
PikcioChain’s technical team 

Advisors 

 

Joe Zhou - CEO & Co-Founder at FirstBlood 
CEO & Co-Founder at FirstBlood, one of the first Ethereum based project that raised 
funding through token launch. Founder and CEO of Alt-Options LLC, the first Bitcoin 
options trading platform based in the US. 

 

Lidia Bolla - Co-Founder at vision&, Crypto Asset Manager 
After obtaining a PhD in Finance, Lidia co-founded start-ups in the field of crypto 
investments and machine learning applications. She advises PikcioChain in data 
analytics and financial services applications. 

30 



 

 

Victor Chow - CEO, Aristagora International 
A serial entrepreneur and senior corporate leader in venture capital, start-ups, 
telecommunications, ICT, financial and education technologies and who turned 
business investor. He held CXO positions across general management, strategic 
planning, business development, sales, marketing and global operations 
management in Asia Pacific, Europe and North America. 

 

Mario Colombo - Technical Lead, Partner at what.digital  
Mario has over 8 years of experience in communications, web development and 
digital marketing. He is an experienced product manager for mobile and web 
applications and specialises in helping start-ups with prototyping, “go to market” 
strategies, customer acquisition and growth hacking. 

 

Luke Szkudlarek - Token Sale Growth Hacking, Founding Partner at 
what.digital  
Luke has over 10 years international experience in the digital sector, leading a 
growth hacking and development agency in Zurich, specialising in fintech & 
cryptofinance. 

 

Thomas Galovic - Founder of Crypto Investment Bank Technocracy Associates 
Thomas has over 7 years of experience in diplomacy and high finance with track 
record of investing USD $2bln. in corporations and USD $40mil. in startups. He holds 
B.Sc. in international finance, MA in international relations and currently doing PhD in 
Political Science. 
 

  

  

  

31 



 

Token Sale 
 
Facts and Figures 
 
Total supply is 83.088.000 PKC (100%). The amount of tokens sold is 36.009.716 PKC (43.4%). 
 
The presale will last until March 16th, 2018 with a 5% bonus.  
 
Public sale will start March 17th, 2018 and will last until March 31st, 2018. No bonuses have been                  
allocated for the public sale.  
 
The token sale is capped at $30.000.000. Once this amount is reached the token sale will be closed.  
 
Unsold tokens will be distributed to the community. In order to claim them, users will be asked to use the                    
PikcioChain platform, such as performing KYC and other useful actions. This aims at increasing usage of                
the PikcioChain platform. 
 

Token Distribution 
 
A total of 43.4% tokens are being sold, including strategic supporters, NEO’s allocation and the pre- and                 
token sale. This number also includes bonus tokens. 
 
The ​B2B premium inventory will only be sold at a premium to business clients. PikcioChain reserves the                 
right to refill its B2B premium inventory by purchasing PKC from the market at any point in time. 
 
The ​B2C growth pool is used for incentivizing customers to use the PikcioChain products, provide data                
and perform useful actions that generate value in the PikcioChain ecosystem. 
 
Team tokens are vested for 2 years. 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Token distribution 
 

32 



 

 

Token Sale FAQs 
 
What is the total token supply of PKC? 
Total token supply is 83,088,000.00 PKC. The total amount of tokens sold is 36.009.716 PKC.  
 
What is the PKC token sale hardcap? 
The hard cap set for pre-sale and public sale is set at 30 million USD.  
 
What is the PKC token sale softcap? 
No softcap has been set for the PKC token sale.  
 
What happens to unsold tokens? 
Unsold tokens will be distributed back to the community. In order to claim them, contributors will be                 
asked to use the PikcioChain platform, such as performing the KYC aspects and other actions. This aims                 
at increasing usage of the PikcioChain platform. 
 
Which payment methods will be accepted during the token sale? 
PKC can be purchased using ETH, NEO or fiat currencies via bank transfer. 
 
What is the price for PKC? 
The exchange rate is set at 150 PKC for 1 NEO. ETH to PKC price is calculated daily based on the NEO                      
to ETH exchange rates and can be found on ​https://pikciochain.com​.  
 
How can I buy PKC?  
You can visit our website ​https://pikciochain.com or alternatively you can use these detailed step-by-step              
guides that we have created for you.  
Buying with Ethereum 
Buying with NEO 
 
How will I know if my PKC purchase was successful? 
You can find a confirmation of your PKC purchase in the personal dashboard on ​https://pikciochain.com​.  
 
When and where will I receive my PKC tokens and will the bonus tokens be vested? 
All PKC tokens (including bonus tokens) will be distributed as soon as possible after the token sale has                  
ended, which is March 31st, 2018. Your PKC tokens will be distributed to the NEO address supplied                 
during purchase. Bonus tokens will not be vested.  
 
Will there be a vesting period for the team, advisory and and bonus tokens? 
Team tokens are vested for 2 years, advisory tokens are not vested, and bonus tokens that participants                 
receive are also not vested.  
 
What do I need in order to receive my PKC? Could you suggest a NEO wallet? 
As PKC is a NEP-5 token, you will need a NEO wallet for us to distribute your tokens towards. We                    
recommend NEON wallet which you can download on ​http://neonwallet.com/ or alternatively you can             
work with ​https://neotracker.io​/​. An in depth setup guide can be found in one of the “how to contribute”                  
articles on ​https://news.pikciochain.com​.  
 

33 

https://pikciochain.com/
https://pikciochain.com/
https://news.pikciochain.com/how-to-contribute-to-pikciochain-tokensale-eth-a691aa5cb1bf
https://news.pikciochain.com/how-to-contribute-to-pikciochain-tokensale-neo-ca8ced095d4e
https://pikciochain.com/
http://neonwallet.com/
https://neotracker.io/
https://neotracker.io/
https://news.pikciochain.com/


 

Where can I see how many PKC tokens I currently hold? 
Aside from the information shown in your own NEON wallet, we have provided a counter in the                 
PikcioChain dashboard displaying your PKC balance in your NEON wallet provided in your account.              
Naturally as the tokens are distributed after the token sale your balance will show zero until PKC tokens                  
have been distributed. 

 
 
When I purchase PKC, am I buying a share of the business or other security? 
No, it’s important to understand that PKC are utility tokens. This means they are used to gain access to                   
services within PikcioChain. As a utility token, PKC is neither a cryptocurrency nor a security token.                
Given this fact, it does not come with rights to any aspect of the business, instead it gives the holder the                     
right to access particular services offered by PikcioChain. 
 
Are there any country limitations on who can participate in the crowdsale? 
Unfortunately US citizens and residents are only to participate if they are accredited investors. Also,               
tokens unfortunately cannot be sold to any citizens or residents from the following: Mainland China,               
Countries or regions comprehensively sanctioned by the US Office of Foreign Assets Control (OFAC)              
(including countries currently sanctioned by the OFAC such as Ukraine, Cuba, Iran, North Korea, Sudan               
and Syria). To make sure, we would advise you to register on the website and going through our KYC                   
process in order to find out if you are eligible for the token sale.  
 
How can the KYC process complete so quickly? 
KYC is one of our core competences. What comes into play here are state of the art technical                  
components that are connected to databases and face detection features that work within milliseconds,              
in order to decide if you get to to the next step of putting in your address details or not. If you get                       
greenlighted immediately, you move forward to the second step. If you are declined, you can't advance                
and if the system can't decide, there is a manual check. There are additional rules we use to manually                   
check data in the background after the immediate application process. If we find information lacking or                
inconsistent we reserve the right to ask for clarification of disputable data such as a better picture or                  
further documents. The whole system is designed to be as easy and as fast as possible for applicants                  
while ensuring maximum accountability. 

 
 
 

 
 

34 



 

 
 

Thank you. 
 
 
  

35 



 

Disclaimer: There Are Certain Risks Related to the Use of Tokens 
 
Important Note:​  As noted elsewhere in these Terms, the Tokens are not being structured or sold as securities or any other form of investment 
product.  Accordingly, none of the information presented here is intended to form the basis for any investment decision, and no specific 
recommendations are intended. The Company expressly disclaims any and all responsibility for any direct or consequential loss or damage of 
any kind whatsoever arising directly or indirectly from: (i) reliance on any information contained herein, (ii) any error, omission or inaccuracy in 
any such information or (iii) any action resulting from such information.  
 
By purchasing, owning, and using Tokens, you expressly acknowledge and assume the following risks: 
 
1.    Risk of Losing Access to Tokens Due to Loss of Private Key(s), Custodial Error or your Error 
A private key, or a combination of private keys, is necessary to control and dispose of Tokens stored in your digital wallet or vault. Accordingly, 
loss of requisite private key(s) associated with your digital wallet or vault storing Tokens will result in loss of such Tokens.  Moreover, any third 
party that gains access to such private key(s), including by gaining access to login credentials of a hosted wallet service you use, may be able to 
misappropriate your Tokens. Any errors or malfunctions caused by or otherwise related to the digital wallet or vault you choose to receive and 
store Tokens, including your own failure to properly maintain or use such digital wallet or vault, may also result in the loss of your Tokens. To 
minimize this risk, you should guard against unauthorized access to your electronic devices. Best practices dictate that you safely store private 
keys in one or more backup locations geographically separating from the working location. Your failure to precisely follow the procedures set 
forth in for buying and receiving Tokens, including, for instance, if you provide an incorrect Token Receipt Address, or provide an address that is 
not compatible with the PikcioChain digital wallet, may result in the loss of your Tokens. 
 
2.    Risks Associated with the PikcioChain Protocol 
Because Tokens and the Ecosystem are based on the PikcioChain protocol, any malfunction, breakdown or abandonment of the PikcioChain 
protocol may have a material adverse effect on the Ecosystem or Tokens.  Moreover, advances in cryptography, or technical advances such as 
the development of quantum computing, could present risks to the Tokens and the Ecosystem, including the utility of the Tokens for obtaining 
Services, by rendering ineffective the cryptographic consensus mechanism that underpins the PikcioChain protocol. 
 
3.    Risks Associated with Matryoshka and Kademlia 
Because the Company intends that some of the smart contracts in the Ecosystem will be based on the Matryoshka and Kademlia protocols, any 
malfunction, breakdown, or abandonment of the Matryoshka and Kademlia protocols may have a material adverse effect on the Ecosystem or 
the utility of the Tokens within the Ecosystem.  Moreover, advances in cryptography, or technical advances such as the development of quantum 
computing, could present risks to the Tokens and the Ecosystem, including the utility of the Tokens for obtaining Services, by rendering 
ineffective the cryptographic consensus mechanism that underpins the Matryoshka and Kademlia protocols.  Additionally, Matryoshka and 
Kademlia, including all necessary features of each such platform, may not be complete in a timely fashion for its use in the growth and 
development of the Ecosystem, which could also have an adverse effect of the utility of the Tokens in the Ecosystem.  
  
4.    Risk of Mining Attacks 
As with other decentralized cryptographic Tokens, the Tokens are susceptible to attacks by miners in the course of validating Coin transactions 
on the PikcioChain, including double-spend attacks, majority mining power attacks, and selfish-mining attacks. Any successful attacks present a 
risk to the Ecosystem and the Tokens, including accurate execution and recording of transactions involving Tokens. 
 
5.    Risk of Hacking and Security Weaknesses 
Hackers or other malicious groups or organizations may attempt to interfere with the Ecosystem or the Tokens in a variety of ways, including 
malware attacks, denial of service attacks, consensus-based attacks, Sybil attacks, smurfing and spoofing.  Furthermore, there is a risk that a 
third party or a member of the Company team may intentionally or unintentionally introduce weaknesses into the core infrastructure of the 
Ecosystem, which could negatively affect the Ecosystem and the Tokens, including the utility of the Tokens for obtaining Services. 
 
6.    Risk of Security Weaknesses in the Company Platform Core Infrastructure Software  
There is a risk that the Company team, or other third parties may intentionally or unintentionally introduce weaknesses or bugs into the core 
infrastructural elements of the Company platform interfering with the use of or causing the loss of Tokens. 
 
7.    Risk of Weaknesses or Exploitable Breakthroughs in the Field of Cryptography  
Advances in cryptography, or technical advances such as the development of quantum computers, could present risks to cryptocurrencies and 
the Ecosystem, which could result in the theft or loss of Tokens. 
 
8.    Risks Associated with Markets for Tokens 
Tokens are intended to be used solely within the Ecosystem and the Company will not support or otherwise facilitate any secondary trading or 
external valuation of Tokens.  This restricts the contemplated avenues for using Tokens to the provision or receipt of Services, and could 
therefore create illiquidity risk with respect to any Tokens you own.  Even if secondary trading of Tokens is facilitated by third-party exchanges, 
such exchanges may be relatively new and subject to little or no regulatory oversight, making them more susceptible to fraud or manipulation. 
Furthermore, to the extent that third parties do ascribe an external exchange value to Tokens (e.g., as denominated in a digital or fiat currency), 
such value may be extremely volatile and diminish to zero. 
 
9.    Risk of Lack of Adoption or Use of the Company Platform  
While the purchase of Tokens should not be viewed as an investment, the Tokens may have value over time.  Such value may be limited or 
non-existent if the Company platform lacks use and adoption.  If this becomes the case, there may be few or no markets following the launch of 
the platform, potentially having an adverse impact on Tokens. 
 
10.    Risk of Uninsured Losses 
Unlike bank accounts or accounts at some other financial institutions, Tokens are uninsured unless you specifically obtain private insurance to 
insure them.  Thus, in the event of loss or loss of utility value, there is no public insurer, such as the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or 
private insurance arranged by Company, to offer recourse to you. 
 

36 



 

11.    Risks Associated with Uncertain Regulations and Enforcement Actions 
The regulatory status of the Tokens and distributed ledger technology is unclear or unsettled in many jurisdictions.  It is difficult to predict how or 
whether regulatory agencies may apply existing regulation with respect to such technology and its applications, including the Ecosystem and the 
Tokens.  It is likewise difficult to predict how or whether legislatures or regulatory agencies may implement changes to law and regulation 
affecting distributed ledger technology and its applications, including the Ecosystem and the Tokens.  The functioning of the Ecosystem and 
Tokens could be impacted by one or more regulatory inquiries or actions, including the licensing or restrictions on the use, sale, or possession of 
Tokens, which could impede limit or end the development of the Company platform and increase legal costs. Further, the Company may cease 
operations in a jurisdiction in the event that regulatory actions, or changes to law or regulation, make it illegal to operate in such jurisdiction, or 
commercially undesirable to obtain the necessary regulatory approval(s) to operate in such jurisdiction. 
 
12.     Risks Arising from Taxation 
The tax characterization of Tokens is uncertain.  You must seek your own tax advice in connection with purchasing Tokens, which may result in 
adverse tax consequences to you, including withholding taxes, income taxes and tax reporting requirements. 
 
13.    Risk of Competing Ecosystems 
It is possible that alternative ecosystems could be established that utilize a source code and protocol similar to those underlying the Ecosystem 
and attempt to facilitate services that are materially similar to the Services. The Ecosystem may compete with these alternatives, which could 
negatively impact the Ecosystem and Tokens, including the utility of the Tokens for obtaining Services. 
 
14.     Risk of Insufficient Interest in the Ecosystem or Distributed Applications 
It is possible that the Ecosystem will not be used by a large number of individuals, companies and other entities or that there will be limited or a 
lack of public interest in the creation and development of distributed ecosystems (such as the Ecosystem) more generally. Such a lack of use or 
interest could negatively impact the development of the Ecosystem and therefore the potential utility of the Tokens, including the utility of the 
Tokens for obtaining Services. 
 
15.    Risks Associated with the Development and Maintenance of the Ecosystem 
The Ecosystem is still under development and may undergo significant changes over time.  Although we intend for the Tokens and Ecosystem to 
function as described in Exhibit A, and intend to take commercially reasonable steps toward those ends, we may have to make changes to the 
specifications of the Tokens or Ecosystem for any number of legitimate reasons.  Moreover, we have no control over how other participants will 
use the Ecosystem, what products or services will be offered through the Ecosystem by third parties, or how third-party products and services 
will utilize Tokens (if at all). This could create the risk that the Tokens or Ecosystem, as further developed and maintained, may not meet your 
expectations at the time of purchase, for any number of reasons including mistaken assumptions or analysis, a change in the design and 
implementation plans, and execution of the Company platform. Furthermore, despite our good faith efforts to develop, complete, and participate 
in the Ecosystem, it is still possible that the Ecosystem will experience malfunctions or otherwise fail to be adequately developed or maintained, 
which may negatively impact the Ecosystem and Tokens, and your Tokens may become useless and/or valueless due to technical, commercial, 
regulatory or any other reasons. 
 
16.    Risk of an Unfavorable Fluctuation of ETH Value 
If the value of ETH fluctuates unfavorably during or after the Crowdsale, we may not be able to fund development, or may not be able to develop 
or maintain the Ecosystem in the manner that it intended.  In addition to the usual market forces, there are several potential events which could 
exacerbate the risk of unfavorable fluctuation in the value of ETH including uncertainties created by the lack of resolution to the bitcoin scaling 
debate, the possibility of a so-called “Hard Fork” of bitcoin if one of the competing camps in the scaling debate decides to force the issue; 
another DAO-like attack on the Ethereum network; or significant security incidents or market irregularities at one or more of the major 
cryptocurrency exchanges. 
 
17.    Risk of Dissolution of the Company or Ecosystem 
It is possible that, due to any number of reasons, including an unfavorable fluctuation in the value of ETH (or other cryptographic and fiat 
currencies), decrease in the Tokens’ utility (including their utility for obtaining Services), the failure of commercial relationships, or intellectual 
property ownership challenges, the Ecosystem may no longer be viable to operate or the Company may dissolve or fail to launch. 
 
18.    Risk of Malfunction in the Ecosystem 
It is possible that the Company platform malfunctions in an unfavorable way, including one that results in the loss of Tokens. 
 
19.    Risks Arising from Lack of Governance Rights 
Because Tokens confer no governance rights of any kind with respect to the Ecosystem or the Company, all decisions involving the Company’s 
products or services within the Ecosystem or the Company itself will be made by the Company at its sole discretion, including decisions to 
discontinue its products or services in the Ecosystem, to create and sell more Tokens for use in the Ecosystem, or to sell or liquidate the 
Company.  These decisions could adversely affect the Ecosystem and the utility of any Tokens you owns, including their utility for obtaining 
Services. 
 
20.     Risks Arising from the Identity Verification Market  
The identity verification industry, and by extension the Ecosystem, is subject to a variety of federal, state and international laws and regulations, 
including those with respect to KYC/AML and customer due diligence procedures, privacy and data protection, consumer protection, data 
security, and others. These laws and regulations, and the interpretation or application of these laws and regulations, could change.  In addition, 
new laws or regulations affecting the Ecosystem could be enacted, which could impact the utility of the Tokens in the Ecosystem.  Additionally, 
the Ecosystem participants are subject to industry specific laws and regulations or licensing requirements.  If any of these parties fails to comply 
with any of these licensing requirements or other applicable laws or regulations, or if such laws and regulations or licensing requirements 
become more stringent or are otherwise expanded, it could adversely impact the Ecosystem and the Tokens, including the Tokens’ utility for 
obtaining Services  
 
21.    Unanticipated Risks 
Cryptographic tokens such as the Tokens are a new and untested technology. In addition to the risks included in this Exhibit C, there are other 
risks associated with your purchase, possession, and use of the Tokens, including unanticipated risks.  Such risks may further materialize as 
unanticipated variations or combinations of the risks discussed in this Exhibit C. 

37 


